apertium-tat.tat.twol
Alphabet

 А Ә Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж Җ З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а ә б в г д е ё ж җ з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а %{U%}:у

 %{L%}:л %{G%}:г %{D%}:д %{K%}:к

 %{s%}:с %{j%}:0 %{w%}:0 %{n%}:0 %{l%}:л %{ъ%}:0 %{т%}:0 %{д%}:0 %{е%}:ы %{ь%}:0

 %>:0 % 

 !!! These are needed for the phonology of numbers, alphabetisms, and acronyms
 !!! They trigger relevant phonology and disappear
 %{а%}:0 %{э%}:0
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{н%}:0 %{з%}:0 %{с%}:0
 !!! And this is currently only for Russian nouns with affixes containing back vowels
 %{☭%}:0 ;

Sets

BackVow    = А О Ы У
             а о ы у ;

FrontVow   = Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
             ә е э и ө ү ;

UnambigFrontVow = Ә Э Ө Ү
                  ә э ө ү ;

AmbigVow  = Я Е Ю
            я е ю ;

Vow       = А О Ы У Я Ю Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
            а о ы у я ю ә е э и ө ү ;

BeginVow  = А О Ы У Ә Э И Ө Ү
            а о ы у ә э и ө ү ;

Cns       =  Б В Г Д Ж Җ З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ
             б в г д ж җ з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ % 
             ү Ү у У ю Ю ;

NasalCns  =  М Н Ң
             м н ң ;

VoicedCns =  Б Д Г В З Ж
             б д г в з ж ;

CnsVoiceless = К П Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч С Ш Щ
               к п т ф х һ ц ч с ш щ ;

RusVclsCns = Б Д Г В ! Жж and Зз keep voiceless consonants after them
             б д г в ;


Rules

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:ә <=>              [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :AmbigVow ]* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
                                                     [ :Cns ь: %>: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] _ ; ! stems ending in e.g. ль
               [ [ :и | :UnambigFrontVow | :ь ] :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
 [ :BackVow %{ь%}: ]/[ %>: | %{I%}: | %{G%}: | %{D%}: | %{L%}: | :л | :ч | :р | :м | :ң | :т | :д | :к | :г ] _ ;
                                                                 [ :FrontVow :Cns+ ъ:* %{ь%}: ]/[ %>: ] :Cns+ _ ; ! шәрекъкә
 except
                                                  [ .#. :е :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] _ ;
                                                                  [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: ?* _ ;
                                               :BackVow [ ? - [ :FrontVow | %{ь%}: | ь: ] ]* _ ;
                       [ :BackVow (й:0) :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ [ %>: | :0 ] - [ ь: | %{ь%}: ] ] _ ;
                                                            [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: ?* :Cns+ _ ; ! повестенда
                                                                                             _ (%>:) %{E%}:и ;
                                                                                             _ %>: %{E%}: ;
                                                                [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                                                                                     :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
                                                             [ :BackVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) %{E%}: ;
                                                        .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) %{E%}: ;
                                           [ [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %{I%}:е :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - ь: ] _ ; ! фасолена
 .#. [ :AmbigVow [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]* _ ; ! ермас
                                                              :BackVow е %>: %{j%}: %{A%}: ч _ к ; ! баеячак, оеячак
                   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                             [ :BackVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                                  [ :Cns+ [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                                        .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                                   [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                   .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! ермый
                              [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! аермый
                   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                   [ [ :Vow - [ :у | :У | :ү | :Ү ] ] | й: | Й: | и: | И: ]/[ %>: | %{j%}: ] _ ;
                                                                               .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
                   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                                                     :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
                                                                                     :Cns/:0 _ [ %{E%}:и | %{E%}:й ]/:0 ;
                                                                                      %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:ы %{E%}:й к: ; ! булдыр+ма+ыйк
                                                                                      %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:? %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
                                                                          %>: м: %{A%}:? %>: _ %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
                   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"Turn {A} to ы before E:й"
%{A%}:ы <=>                     [ :BackVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                     [ :Cns+ [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                           .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                      [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
      .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! ермый
 [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! аермый
 except
     .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) [ :с ] ; ! ерачак, ермас


"Convert {A} to я after й, и and {j}"
%{A%}:я <=> [ [ :Vow - [ :у | :У | :ү | :Ү ] ] | й: | Й: | и: | И: ]/[ %>: | %{j%}: ] _ ;
                                                                        .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
            except
                                  _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;
               !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                          :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
                          :Cns/:0 _ [ %{E%}:и | %{E%}:й ]/:0 ;
                           %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:ы %{E%}:й к: ; ! булдыр+ма+ыйк
                           %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:? %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
               %>: м: %{A%}:? %>: _ %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
               !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"Delete {A} before E:и"
%{A%}:0 <=>      :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
                 :Cns/:0 _ [ %{E%}:и | %{E%}:й ]/:0 ;
                  %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:ы %{E%}:й к: ; ! булдыр+ма+ыйк
                  %>: м: _ %>: %{A%}:? %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
      %>: м: %{A%}:? %>: _ %{E%}:и к: ; ! кил+мә+ик
      except
          .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ %{A%}:* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ; ! ермыйк
                                          [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                      [ :BackVow :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;
                                      .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ %>: ] _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;
                                                       [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                                                                      .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
                     !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                    [ :BackVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                         [ :Cns+ [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                               .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                                          [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
                          .#. [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! ермый
                     [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | :0 ] :м _ (%>:) %{E%}:й ; ! аермый                                                                      
                     !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"Turn а to ы before E:й"
а:ы <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:й ;
        except
            [ %{ь%}: ] %>: ?* _ ;


"Delete ә before E:и"
ә:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:и ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Turn {E} into й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=>            [ :Vow - :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
           [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] я:й 0:ы ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! буя -> буйый, ая -> айый
           except
                [ [ :FrontVow - :е ] :Cns+ %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;
               [ :FrontVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ; ! иярмик
                [ [ е: | ә: ] [ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 | [ %>: | %{A%}: ] ] _ ;
                                                                               FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;
                                                                 [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                                                                              [ :у | :У ] %>: _ ;


"Turn {E} into и to combine with ә and е"  ! сөйлә>{E}:сөйли
                                           ! төзе>{E}:төзи
%{E%}:и <=>          [ [ е: | ә: ] [ %{ь%}: ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 | [ %>: | %{A%}: ] ] _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :Cns+ %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;
                                                        :FrontVow :й %>: %{A%}:0 _ [ :м | :к ] ; ! җәйик
                                                                  :и %>: %{A%}:0 _ ; ! киик
                                                      %>: м: %{A%}:0 %>: %{A%}:0 _ [ :к | :м ] ; ! кил+мә+ик
                                                               :FrontVow я:й %>: _ [ %>: | .#. ] ; ! төя -> төйи
            except
                                         [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: ?* _ ;
                :BackVow [ ? - [ :FrontVow | %{ь%}: | ь: | ә:0 ] ]* _ ;
                                       [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                                                      .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
   [ :FrontVow Cns:Cns+ ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;
   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                  [ :Vow - :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                      [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] я:й 0:ы ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! буя -> буйый, ая -> айый
   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
